Nevada, session 83, SB114.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 118A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A landlord of a covered premises shall establish:
(a) A policy requiring an applicant for employment with the
landlord to undergo a criminal background check as a condition
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
of employment if the position for which the applicant is applying
entails access to any dwelling unit key; and
(b) Written policies and procedures regarding the:
(1) Storage, issuance, return and security of dwelling unit
keys; and
(2) If applicable, the usage and deactivation of dwelling
unit keys.
2. A landlord of a covered premises shall maintain on the
premises a log that accounts for the issuance and return of each
dwelling unit key and the written policies and procedures
established pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1.
3. In addition to any other remedies, if a landlord of a
covered premises violates this section, a person aggrieved by the
violation or a district attorney may bring a civil action in a court
of competent jurisdiction against the landlord to seek any or all of
the following relief:
(a) Declaratory and injunctive relief.
(b) Actual damages.
(c) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.
(d) Any other legal or equitable relief that the court deems
appropriate.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Covered premises” means:
(1) In a county whose population is 100,000 or more, a
premises comprising more than 50 dwelling units attached to a
single parcel of property; or
(2) In a county whose population is less than 100,000, a
premises comprising more than 30 dwelling units attached to a
single parcel of property.
(b) “Dwelling unit key” means any physical or electronic
mechanism used to gain access to a dwelling unit, including,
without limitation, a combination or access code.
(c) “Financial institution” means any bank, savings and loan
association, savings bank, thrift company, credit union or
financial institution that is licensed, registered or otherwise
authorized to do business in this State.
(d) “Landlord” does not include a financial institution, real
estate broker, real estate broker-salesperson or real estate
salesperson.
(e) “Real estate broker” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 645.030.
(f) “Real estate broker-salesperson” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 645.035.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(g) “Real estate salesperson” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 645.040.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)